Utah statutes.
73-20-5.   Consultation with Agricultural Advisory Board.

The board, before making any expenditure of emergency funds appropriated under this act, shall consult with and receive the advice of the advisory board with respect to the demonstrated need for financial assistance in the form of the development of a water resource.

